Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2104.02
Art therapy, defined.

(1) Art therapy means the integrative application of psychotherapeutic principles and methods with specialized training in strategic use of art media, the neurobiological implications of art-making, and art-based assessment models in the evaluation, assessment, and treatment of normal and abnormal cognitive, developmental, emotional, and behavioral disorders and conditions in individuals, families, and groups.

(2) Subject to subsection (3) of this section, art therapy includes, but is not limited to:

(a) Appraisal activities involving selecting, administering, and interpreting art-based appraisal tools and standard diagnostic instruments designed to assess levels of functioning, aptitudes, abilities, and personal characteristics to determine treatment plans and appropriate art-based interventions;

(b) Use of art media and the creative process to assess a client's inner fears, conflicts, and core issues with the goal of improving physical, cognitive, and emotional functioning and increasing self-awareness and self-esteem;

(c) Strategic application of therapeutic interventions in individual and group sessions to facilitate visual, nonverbal, and verbal receptive and expressive communication and engagement;

(d) Use of art-making and the verbal processing of produced imagery to help clients improve cognitive and sensory-motor functions and reduce symptoms of depression, anxiety, post-traumatic stress, and attachment disorders;

(e) Implementation of treatment plans to help clients resolve conflicts and distress, manage anger, cope with traumatic experience and grief, develop interpersonal skills, and improve educational performance, vocational performance, and social functioning;

(f) Adjustment of appraisal and evaluation techniques and treatments to address multicultural and diversity issues;

(g) Referral activities which evaluate data to identify clients or groups that may be better served by other specialists; and

(h) Provision of consultation, crisis intervention, client advocacy, and education services to clients.

(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize a certified art therapist to engage in the practice of clinical psychology as provided in section 38-3111.

Laws 2024, LB605, § 7.